District of Columbia statutes.
16-2102

Death of party to the contract.

If a person specified by section 16-2101 dies, his executors, administrators, or heirs are bound by the contract in the same manner and to the same extent as if the contract or obligation were expressed to be joint and several.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 585, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-2102.
1973 Ed., § 16-2102.